Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-467
Savings clause.

The Uniform Partnership Act of 1998 does not affect an action or proceeding commenced or right accrued before the act becomes operative.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 67.